District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-780

Admission of pay patients to contagious-disease ward of General Hospital.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 14, 1932, 47 Stat. 79, ch. 98, § 1
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 12(f), 30 DCR 5778

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-110.
1973 Ed., § 32-309.